Nebraska, session 109, LB1047.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1047 LB1047
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 9-204, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
9-204 (1) Bingo means shall mean that form of gambling in which:
(a) The winning numbers or song titles, musical artists, or music
genres are determined by random selection from a pool of seventy-five or
ninety numbered designators or song titles, musical artists, or music
genres; and
(b) A player marks by physically daubing or covering or,
automatically or manually with the aid of a bingo card monitoring device,
enters or otherwise conceals those randomly selected numbers or song
titles, musical artists, or music genres which match on a bingo card that
the player has purchased or leased only at the time and place of the
bingo occasion.
(2) Bingo does not shall not mean or include:
(a) Any scheme which uses any mechanical gaming device, computer
gaming device, electronic gaming device, or video gaming device which has
the capability of awarding something of value, free games redeemable for
something of value, or tickets or stubs redeemable for something of
value;
(b) Any activity which is authorized or regulated under the Nebraska
County and City Lottery Act, the Nebraska Lottery and Raffle Act, the
Nebraska Pickle Card Lottery Act, the Nebraska Small Lottery and Raffle
Act, the State Lottery Act, section 9-701, or Chapter 2, article 12; or
(c) Any activity which is prohibited under Chapter 28, article 11.
Sec. 2. Section 9-204.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
9-204.01 Bingo card means shall mean:
(1) In the case of seventy-five-square seventy-five-number bingo, a
disposable paper bingo card, a facsimile of a bingo card electronically
displayed on a bingo card monitoring device, or a reusable hard bingo
card or shutter card, which has letters and numbers or song titles,
-2-

LB1047 LB1047
2026 2026
musical artists, or music genres preprinted or predetermined by a
manufacturer and which:
(a) Contains five columns with five squares in each column;
(b) Identifies the five columns from left to right by the letters B-
I-N-G-O; and
(c) Contains in each square, except for the center square identified
as "free", one number or song title, musical artist, or music genre from
a pool of seventy-five numbers or song titles, musical artists, or music
genres; or
(2) In the case of ninety-number bingo, a disposable paper bingo
card or facsimile of a bingo card electronically displayed on a bingo
card monitoring device which has numbers preprinted or predetermined by a
manufacturer and which:
(a) Contains six faces with each face containing twenty-seven
squares arranged in nine columns of three squares each; and
(b) Contains in fifteen squares of each face a number from one to
ninety which is not repeated on the same card.
The department may approve variations to the card formats described
in subdivisions (1) and (2) of this section if such variations result in
a bingo game which is conducted in a manner that is consistent with
section 9-204.
Sec. 3. Section 9-204.04, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
9-204.04 Bingo card monitoring device means shall mean a
technological aid which allows a bingo player to automatically or
manually enter bingo numbers or song titles, musical artists, or music
genres as they are announced at a bingo occasion and which enters or
otherwise conceals those numbers or song titles, musical artists, or
music genres on bingo cards which are electronically stored in and
displayed on the device. A bingo card monitoring device shall not mean or
include any device (1) into which currency, coins, or tokens may be
-3-

LB1047 LB1047
2026 2026
inserted or from which currency, coins, tokens, or any receipt for
monetary value can be dispensed or (2) which, once provided to a bingo
player, is capable of communicating with any other bingo card monitoring
device or any other form of electronic device or computer, except that
such device may communicate with its host system.
Sec. 4. Section 9-230, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
9-230 No person, except a licensed organization or qualifying
nonprofit organization operating pursuant to the Nebraska Bingo Act,
shall conduct any game of bingo for which a charge is made, and no person
except a licensed organization shall award any prize with a value in
excess of fifty twenty-five dollars for any bingo game. Any such game
conducted in violation of this section is hereby declared to be a public
nuisance. Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be
guilty of a Class III misdemeanor for the first offense and a Class I
misdemeanor for the second or subsequent offense.
Sec. 5. Section 9-230.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
9-230.01 (1) A qualifying nonprofit organization may apply to the
department for a permit to conduct a special event bingo in conjunction
with a special event at which bingo is not the primary function. Such
special event bingo shall be exempt from (a) the licensing requirements
found in the Nebraska Bingo Act for Class I and Class II licenses, (b)
the record-keeping and reporting requirements found in the act for
licensed organizations, and (c) any tax on the gross receipts derived
from the conduct of bingo as provided in the act for licensed
organizations.
(2) A qualifying nonprofit organization may apply for and obtain two
special event bingo permits per calendar year, not to exceed a total of
fourteen days in duration. An application for a permit shall be made, on
a form prescribed by the department, at least ten days prior to the
-4-

LB1047 LB1047
2026 2026
desired starting date of the special event bingo. The form shall be
accompanied by a permit fee of fifteen dollars and shall contain:
(a) The name and address of the nonprofit organization applying for
the permit;
(b) Sufficient facts relating to the nature of the organization to
enable the department to determine if the organization is eligible for
the permit;
(c) The date, time, place, duration, and nature of the special event
at which the special event bingo will be conducted;
(d) The name, address, and telephone number of the individual who
will be in charge of the special event bingo; and
(e) Any other information which the department deems necessary.
(3) An organization must have a permit issued by the department
before it can conduct a special event bingo. The permit shall be clearly
posted and visible to all participants at the special event bingo.
(4) Special event bingo shall be subject to the following:
(a) Special event bingo shall be conducted only within the county in
which the qualifying nonprofit organization has its principal office;
(b) Bingo equipment, other than disposable paper bingo cards,
necessary to conduct bingo may be obtained from any source. Disposable
paper bingo cards may be obtained only from (i) a licensed distributor or
(ii) a licensed organization as provided in subdivision (4)(e) of section
9-241.05;
(c) No bingo card used at a special event bingo shall be sold,
rented, or leased for more than one dollar twenty-five cents per card;
(d) No single prize shall be offered or awarded at a special event
bingo which exceeds fifty twenty-five dollars in value;
(e) A special event bingo shall be conducted by individuals who are
at least eighteen years of age. The qualifying nonprofit organization may
permit individuals under eighteen years of age to play special event
bingo when no alcoholic beverages are served, sold, or consumed in the
-5-

LB1047 LB1047
2026 2026
immediate vicinity of where the special event bingo is conducted;
(f) No wage, commission, or salary shall be paid to any person in
connection with the conduct of a special event bingo; and
(g) The gross receipts from the conduct of a special event bingo
shall be used solely for the awarding of prizes and reasonable and
necessary expenses associated with the conduct of the special event bingo
such as the permit fee and the purchase or rental of bingo cards or other
equipment needed to conduct bingo. The remaining receipts shall be used
solely for a lawful purpose.
Sec. 6. Section 9-241.08, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
9-241.08 (1) No person under eighteen years of age shall play or
participate in any bingo game, except that any person may play bingo at a
limited period bingo or special event bingo if (a) no alcoholic beverages
are served and (b) no prize or prizes to be awarded exceed fifty twenty-
five dollars in value per game.
(2) All persons involved in the conduct of bingo must be at least
eighteen years of age.
(3) No person who is conducting or assisting in the conduct of a
bingo occasion shall be permitted to participate as a player at that
bingo occasion.
(4) No licensed commercial lessor, distributor, or manufacturer,
person having a substantial interest in a licensed commercial lessor,
distributor, or manufacturer, or employee or agent of a licensed
commercial lessor, distributor, or manufacturer shall operate, manage,
conduct, advise, or assist in the operating, managing, conducting,
promoting, or administering of any bingo game or occasion. For purposes
of this subsection, the term assist shall include, but not be limited to,
the payment of any expense of a licensed organization, whether such
payment is by loan or otherwise.
(5) No person, licensee, or permittee or employee or agent thereof
-6-

LB1047 LB1047
2026 2026
shall knowingly permit an individual under eighteen years of age to play
or participate in any way in a bingo game conducted pursuant to the
Nebraska Bingo Act, excluding those individuals allowed by law to play at
a limited period bingo or special event bingo when (a) no alcoholic
beverages are served and (b) no prize or prizes that will be awarded
exceed fifty twenty-five dollars in value per game.
Sec. 7. Section 9-255, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
9-255 (1)(a) Only the following means of random selection of the
numbered designators shall be used in the conduct of any bingo game:
(i) (1) An electrically operated blower machine containing balls
which the operator may take from the air one at a time while the blower
is in operation, or which provides a trap or other mechanical means for
automatically catching not more than one ball at a time while the blower
is in operation; or
(ii) (2) A mechanically or manually operated cage which provides a
trap or other mechanical means for automatically catching not more than
one ball at a time while the cage is in operation.
(b) For any means of selection permitted by subdivisions (1) and (2)
of this section, the balls to be drawn shall be essentially the same in
size, shape, weight, balance, and all other characteristics so that at
all times during the conduct of bingo each ball possesses the capacity
for equal agitation with any other ball within the receptacle. All balls
within the total set shall be subject to random selection at the
beginning of each bingo game.
(2) For purposes of bingo utilizing song titles, musical artists, or
music genres, only a mechanical, manually operated, or electronic device
that ensures song titles, musical artists, or music genres are randomly
selected shall be used in the conduct of such a bingo game.
Sec. 8. Original sections 9-204.01, 9-230, 9-230.01, 9-241.08, and
9-255, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 9-204 and
-7-

LB1047 LB1047
2026 2026
9-204.04, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-8-